Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-597
Railroad accident or unlawful operation; prohibited law enforcement procedures.

In any circumstances involving a railroad accident or the operation of a train in violation of state law or local ordinance, no engineer or other crew member of the train shall be required to furnish a motor vehicle operator's license to any state or local law enforcement officer, nor shall any citation involving the operation of a train be issued against the motor vehicle operator's license of the engineer or any other crew member of the train.

Laws 1981, LB 437, § 2.